District of Columbia statutes.
16-543

Revival of judgment unnecessary.

Attachment may be issued at any time during the life of the judgment, without issuing an order reviving the judgment previously thereto.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 552, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-543.
1973 Ed., § 16-543.